Hawaii statutes.
CIVIL
COMPLIANCE; SPECIAL ENFORCEMENT SECTION

[§231-81] Special enforcement
section; created. [(a)] There is created within the department of
taxation the special enforcement section to carry out civil enforcement efforts
as directed by the director of taxation. The director may staff the section as
the exigencies of the public service may require.

[(b)] The department of taxation shall report
to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of each
regular session the state resources committed to implementing [Act 134, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2009] and the additional revenues raised therefor. [L 2009, c
134, pt of §2, §13(3); am L 2013, c 58, §1]

Revision Note

L 2009, c 134, §9 is codified to this section pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next